Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2721
Applicability of sections.

The provisions of sections 30-2722 to 30-2726 concerning beneficial ownership as between parties or as between parties and beneficiaries apply only to controversies between those persons and their creditors and other successors, and do not apply to the rights of those persons to payment as determined by the terms of the account. Sections 30-2727 to 30-2733 govern the liability and setoff rights of financial institutions that make payments pursuant to such sections.

Laws 1993, LB 250, § 7.